Alaska, session 34, HB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to article 2 to read: 05 Sec. 44.12.197. Alaska Arts and Culture Day. Alaska Arts and Culture Day 06 is established on the first Friday of October each year. Alaska Arts and Culture Day 07 may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies 08 and individuals with celebratory events, projects, and activities directed at or involving 09 people of all ages to increase awareness and appreciation of arts and culture in the 10 state. 11 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.